California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(c) For the purposes of this section, “account” includes all accounts having the same beneficiary.

(d) This section is not subject to the requirements of Section 703.150.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 25, Sec. 2.   (SB 956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

704.110.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Public entity” means the state, or a city, city and county, county, or other political subdivision of the state, or a public trust, public corporation, or public board, or the governing body of any of them, but does not include the United States except where expressly so provided.

(2) “Public retirement benefit” means a pension or an annuity, or a retirement, disability,
 death, or other benefit, paid or payable by a public retirement system.

(3) “Public retirement system” means a system established pursuant to statute by a public entity for retirement, annuity, or pension purposes or payment of disability or death benefits.

(b) All amounts held, controlled, or in process of distribution by a public entity derived from contributions by the public entity or by an officer or employee of the public entity for public retirement benefit purposes, and all rights and benefits accrued or accruing to any person under a public retirement system, are exempt without making a claim.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), where an amount described in subdivision (b) becomes payable to a person and is sought to be applied to the satisfaction of a judgment for child, family, or spousal support against
 that person:

(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), the amount is exempt only to the extent that the court determines under subdivision (c) of Section 703.070.

(2) If the amount sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment is payable periodically, the amount payable is subject to an earnings assignment order for support as defined in Section 706.011, or any other applicable enforcement procedure, but the amount to be withheld pursuant to the assignment order or other procedure shall not exceed the amount permitted to be withheld on an earnings withholding order for support under Section 706.052. The paying entity may deduct from the payment being made to the judgment debtor, for each payment made pursuant to an earnings assignment order under this paragraph, an amount reflecting the actual cost of administration caused by the assignment order of up to two
 dollars ($2) for each payment.

(3) If the intercept procedure provided for in Section 11357 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is used for benefits that are payable periodically, the amount to be withheld shall not exceed the amount permitted to be withheld on an earnings withholding order for support under Section 706.052.

(4) If the amount sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment is payable as a lump-sum distribution, the amount payable is subject to the intercept procedure provided in Section 11357 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or any other applicable enforcement procedure. 

(d) All amounts received by any person, a resident of the state, as a public retirement benefit or as a return of contributions and interest thereon from the United States or a public entity or from a public retirement
 system are exempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 927, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

704.111.

Alimony, support, and separate maintenance, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any dependent of the debtor, are exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 5.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

704.113.

(a) As used in this chapter, “vacation credits” means vacation credits accumulated by a state employee pursuant to Section 19858.1 of the Government Code or by any other public employee pursuant to any law for the accumulation of vacation credits applicable to the employee.

(b) The aggregate interest, not to exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), in vacation credits or accrued, or unused, vacation pay, sick leave, or family
 leave is exempt.

(c) Amounts paid periodically or as a lump sum representing vacation credits are subject to any earnings withholding order served under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) or any earnings assignment order for support as defined in Section 706.011 and are exempt to the same extent as earnings of a judgment debtor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 6.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

704.114.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, service of an earnings assignment order for support, or an order or notice to withhold income for child support on any public entity described in Section 704.110, other than the United States government, creates a lien on all employee contributions in the amount necessary to satisfy a support judgment as determined under Section 695.210 to the extent that the judgment remains enforceable.

(b) The public entity shall
 comply with any request for a return of employee contributions by an employee named in the order or notice to withhold by delivering the contributions to the clerk of the court in which the support order was awarded or last registered, unless the entity has received a certified copy of an order or administrative notice terminating the earnings assignment order for support.

(c) Upon receipt of moneys pursuant to this section, the clerk of the court, within 10 days, shall send written notice of the receipt of the deposit to the parties and to the local child support agency enforcing any order pursuant to Section 17400 of the Family Code.

(d) Moneys received pursuant to this section are subject to any procedure available to enforce an order for support, but if no enforcement procedure is commenced after 30 days have elapsed from the date the notice of receipt is sent, the clerk
 shall, upon request, return the moneys to the public entity that delivered the moneys to the court unless the public entity has informed the court in writing that the moneys shall be released to the employee.

(e) A court shall not directly or indirectly condition the issuance, modification, or termination of, or condition the terms or conditions of, any order for support upon the making of a request for the return of employee contributions by an employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 13.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

704.115.

(a) As used in this section, “retirement plan”
 means:

(1) Private retirement plans, including, but not limited to, union retirement plans.

(2) Profit-sharing plans designed and used for retirement purposes.

(3) Self-employed retirement plans and individual retirement annuities or accounts provided for in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, including individual retirement accounts qualified under Section 408 or 408A of that code, to the extent the amounts held in the plans, annuities, or accounts do not exceed the maximum amounts exempt from federal income taxation under that code.

(4) Retirement funds to the extent that those funds are in a fund or account that is exempt
 from taxation under Sections 403, 414, or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, to the extent the amounts held in the plans, annuities, or accounts do not exceed the maximum amounts exempt from federal income taxation under that code and are not otherwise exempt under federal law.

(b) All amounts held, controlled, or in process of distribution by a retirement plan, for the payment of benefits as an annuity, pension, retirement allowance, disability payment, or death benefit from a retirement plan are exempt.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), where an amount described in subdivision (b) becomes payable to a person and is sought to be applied to the satisfaction of a judgment for child, family, or spousal support against that person:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the amount is exempt only to the extent that the court determines under subdivision (c) of Section 703.070.

(2) If the amount sought to be applied to the satisfaction of the judgment is payable periodically, the amount payable is subject to an earnings assignment order for support as defined in Section 706.011 or any other applicable enforcement procedure, but the amount to be withheld pursuant to the assignment order or other
 procedure shall not exceed the amount permitted to be withheld on an earnings withholding order for support under Section 706.052.

(d) After payment, the amounts described in subdivision (b) and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of a retirement plan are exempt.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (d), except as provided in subdivision (f), the amounts described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) are exempt only to the extent necessary to provide for the support of the judgment debtor when the judgment debtor retires and for the support of the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor, taking into account all resources that are likely to be available for the support of the judgment debtor
 when the judgment debtor retires.

(2) For personal debt, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 683.110, the amount necessary to provide for the support of the judgment debtor cannot be, unless otherwise provided by federal law, less than the amount listed in subsection (n) of Section 522 of Title 11 of the United States Code, as adjusted in accordance with subsection (b) of Section 104 of Title 11 of the United States Code. The exempt amount may be aggregated across all retirement plans in the judgment debtor’s name. The exempt amount may be reduced to the extent that such value is attributable to any portion of any property the debtor disposed of with the intent to hinder, delay, or defraud a creditor, and that the debtor could not have exempted at the time the debtor so disposed of the property.

(3) In determining the amount to be exempt under this subdivision, the court shall allow the judgment debtor such additional amount as is necessary to pay any federal and state income taxes owed as a result of the application of funds in a retirement plan to the satisfaction of the money judgment.

(f) Where the amounts described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) are payable periodically, the amount of the periodic payment that may be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment is the amount that may be withheld from a like amount of earnings under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) (Wage Garnishment Law). To the extent a lump-sum distribution from an individual retirement account is treated differently from a periodic distribution under this subdivision, any lump-sum distribution from an account qualified under
 Section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated the same as a lump-sum distribution from an account qualified under Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of determining whether any of that payment may be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 7.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

704.120.

(a) Contributions by workers payable to the Unemployment Compensation Disability Fund and by employers payable to the Unemployment Fund are exempt without making a claim.

(b) Before payment, amounts held for payment of the following benefits are exempt without making a claim:

(1) Benefits payable under Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) Incentives payable under Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) Benefits payable under an employer’s plan or system to supplement unemployment compensation benefits of the employees generally or for a class or group of employees.

(4) Unemployment benefits payable by a fraternal organization to its bona fide members.

(5) Benefits payable by a union due to a labor dispute.

(c) After payment, the benefits described in subdivision (b) are exempt.

(d) During the payment of benefits described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to a judgment debtor under a support judgment, the judgment
 creditor may, through the appropriate local child support agency, seek to apply the benefit payment to satisfy the judgment as provided by Section 17518 of the Family Code.

(e) During the payment of benefits described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) to a judgment debtor under a support judgment, the judgment creditor may, directly or through the appropriate local child support agency, seek to apply the benefit payments to satisfy the judgment by an earnings assignment order for support as defined in Section 706.011 or any other applicable enforcement procedure. If the benefit is payable periodically, the amount to be withheld pursuant to the assignment order or other procedure shall be 25 percent of the amount of each periodic payment or any lower amount specified in writing by the judgment creditor or court order, rounded down to the nearest whole dollar. Otherwise the amount to be withheld shall be the amount the court
 determines under subdivision (c) of Section 703.070. The paying entity may deduct from each payment made pursuant to an assignment order under this subdivision an amount reflecting the actual cost of administration caused by the assignment order up to two dollars ($2) for each payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 14.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

704.130.

(a) Before payment, benefits from a disability or health insurance policy or program are exempt without making a claim. After payment, the benefits are exempt.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to benefits that are paid or payable to cover the cost of health care if the judgment creditor is a provider of health care whose claim is the basis on which the benefits are paid or payable.

(c) During the
 payment of disability benefits described in subdivision (a) to a judgment debtor under a support judgment, the judgment creditor or local child support agency may seek to apply the benefit payments to satisfy the judgment by an earnings assignment order for support, as defined in Section 706.011, or any other applicable enforcement procedure, but the amount to be withheld pursuant to the earnings assignment order or other procedure shall not exceed the amount permitted to be withheld on an earnings assignment order for support under Section 706.052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 15.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

704.140.

(a) Except as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 708.410) of Chapter 6, a cause of action for personal injury is exempt without making a claim.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), an award of damages or a settlement arising out of personal injury is exempt to the extent necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply if the judgment creditor is a provider of health care whose claim is
 based on the providing of health care for the personal injury for which the award or settlement was made.

(d) Where an award of damages or a settlement arising out of personal injury is payable periodically, the amount of such periodic payment that may be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment is the amount that may be withheld from a like amount of earnings under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) (Wage Garnishment Law).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.150.

(a) Except as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 708.410) of Chapter 6, a cause of action for wrongful death is exempt without making a claim.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), an award of damages or a settlement arising out of the wrongful death of the judgment debtor’s spouse or a person on whom the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse was dependent is exempt to the extent reasonably necessary for support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(c) Where an award of damages or a settlement arising out of the wrongful death of the judgment debtor’s spouse or a person on whom the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse was dependent is payable periodically, the amount of such a periodic payment that may be applied to the satisfaction of a money judgment is the amount that may be withheld from a like amount of earnings under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) (Wage Garnishment Law).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.160.

(a) Except as provided by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4900) of Part 3 of Division 4 of the Labor Code, before payment, a claim for workers’ compensation or workers’ compensation awarded or adjudged is exempt without making a claim. Except as specified in subdivision (b), after payment, the award is exempt.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during the payment of workers’ compensation temporary disability benefits described in subdivision (a) to a
 support judgment debtor, the support judgment creditor may, through the appropriate local child support agency, seek to apply the workers’ compensation temporary disability benefit payment to satisfy the support judgment as provided by Section 17404 of the Family Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, during the payment of workers’ compensation temporary disability benefits described in subdivision (a) to a support judgment debtor under a support judgment, including a judgment for reimbursement of public assistance, the judgment creditor may, directly or through the appropriate local child support agency, seek to apply the temporary disability benefit payments to satisfy the support judgment by an earnings assignment order for support, as defined in Section 5208 of the Family Code, or any other applicable enforcement procedure. The amount to be withheld pursuant to the earnings assignment order for support or other enforcement
 procedure shall be 25 percent of the amount of each periodic payment or any lower amount specified in writing by the judgment creditor or court order, rounded down to the nearest dollar. Otherwise, the amount to be withheld shall be the amount the court determines under subdivision (c) of Section 703.070. The paying entity may deduct from each payment made pursuant to an order assigning earnings under this subdivision an amount reflecting the actual cost of administration of this assignment, up to two dollars ($2) for each payment.

(d) Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this section.

(1) “Judgment debtor” or “support judgment debtor” means a person who is owing a duty of support.

(2) “Judgment creditor” or “support judgment creditor” means the
 person to whom support has been ordered to be paid.

(3) “Support” refers to an obligation owing on behalf of a child, spouse, or family; or an amount owing pursuant to Section 17402 of the Family Code. It also includes past due support or arrearage when it exists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 16.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

704.170.

Before payment, aid provided pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Welfare and Institutions Code or similar aid provided by a charitable organization or a fraternal benefit society as defined in Section 10990 of the Insurance Code, is exempt without making a claim. After payment, the aid is exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.180.

Before payment, relocation benefits for displacement from a dwelling which are to be paid pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 7260) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code or the federal “Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970” (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4601 et seq.), as amended, are exempt without making a claim. After payment, the benefits are exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.190.

(a) As used in this section, “institution of higher education” means “institution of higher education” as defined in Section 1141(a) of Title 20 of the United States Code, as amended.

(b) Before payment, financial aid for expenses while attending school provided to a student by an institution of higher education is exempt without making a claim. After payment, the aid is exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.200.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Cemetery” has the meaning provided by Section 7003 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Family plot” is a plot that satisfies the requirements of Section 8650 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Plot” has the meaning provided by Section 7022 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A family plot is exempt without making a claim.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a cemetery plot for the judgment debtor and the spouse of the judgment debtor is exempt.

(d) Land held for the purpose of sale or disposition as cemetery plots or otherwise is not exempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.210.

Property that is not subject to enforcement of a money judgment is exempt without making a claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1364, Sec. 2.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

704.220.

(a) Money in the judgment debtor’s deposit account in an amount equal to or less than the minimum basic standard of adequate care for a family of four for Region 1, established by Section 11452 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and as annually adjusted by the State Department of Social Services pursuant to Section 11453 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, is exempt without making a claim.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not preclude or reduce a judgment debtor’s right to any other exemption provided by state or federal law.

(2) If the financial institution holding the judgment debtor’s deposit
 account has actual knowledge that the judgment debtor is entitled to one or more exemptions that the financial institution is required to apply pursuant to federal law or state law other than that set forth in subdivision (a), the following shall apply:

(A) If the sum of the amount of money in the deposit account that would be exempt from levy under the additional exemptions is less than or equal to the amount set forth in subdivision (a), the additional exemptions described in this paragraph shall be considered encompassed within the exemption set forth in subdivision (a) and subdivision (a) shall apply.

(B) If the sum of the amount of money in the deposit account that would be exempt from levy under the additional exemptions is greater than the amount set forth in subdivision (a),
 subdivision (a) shall not apply and instead money in the deposit account equal to or less than the sum of the additional exemptions is exempt without making a claim.

(c) Subdivision (a) does not apply to money levied upon to satisfy any of the following:

(1) A levy to satisfy a judgment for wages owed, child support, or spousal support. For purposes of this paragraph, “wages owed” includes damages and penalties.

(2) A provision of the Public Resources Code, Revenue and Taxation Code, or Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) A warrant or notice of levy issued by the state, or any department or agency thereof, for the collection of a liability.

(d) A levy against a judgment debtor’s deposit account shall include a written description of the requirements of this section.

(e) (1) The exemption applies per debtor, not per account.

(2) If a judgment debtor holds an interest in multiple accounts at a single financial institution, the judgment creditor or judgment debtor may file an ex parte application in the superior court in which the judgment was entered for a hearing to establish how and to which account the exemption should be applied. Subject to a service of an order issued in that hearing, if any, the financial institution may determine how and to which account the exemption should be applied. This paragraph does not create a cause of action against
 a judgment creditor who executes a levy or against a financial institution that complies with a levy pursuant to the court’s determination.

(3) If a judgment debtor holds an interest in multiple accounts at two or more financial institutions, the judgment creditor shall, and the judgment debtor may, file an ex parte application in the superior court in which the judgment was entered for a hearing to establish how and to which account the exemption should be applied. Subject to a service of an order issued in that hearing, if any, the financial institutions shall comply with the levy subject to the exemption. This paragraph does not create a cause of action against a judgment creditor who executes a levy or against a financial institution which complies with a levy pursuant to the court’s determination.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if a judgment debtor holds multiple accounts at a single financial institution, and those accounts cumulatively contain an amount less than or equal to the amount specified in subdivision (a), the financial institution shall protect the full amount in those accounts.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if a judgment debtor holds multiple accounts at a single financial institution, and each of those accounts contains an amount less than the amount specified in subdivision (a) but the accounts cumulatively contain an amount greater than the amount specified in subdivision (a), the financial institution shall protect an aggregate amount equal to the amount specified in subdivision (a).

(f) Subdivision (e) of Section 700.140 applies to a financial institution acting under this section.

(g) The Judicial Council shall amend or adopt all forms necessary to implement this section. The forms shall clearly delineate the amount of funds exempt from levy by a financial institution, including funds exempted by this section.

(h) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 514, Sec. 8.   (AB 2837)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

704.225.

Money in a judgment debtor’s deposit account that is not otherwise exempt under this chapter is exempt to the extent necessary for the support of the judgment debtor and the spouse and dependents of the judgment debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 552, Sec. 9.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

704.230.

Money provided to the judgment debtor by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) is exempt without making a claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 552, Sec. 10.   (SB 616)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

704.235.

(a) A one-time lump-sum payment made from a HOPE trust account, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18997.51 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be exempt without making a claim, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) A one-time lump-sum payment described in subdivision (a) is not exempt from a levy in connection with child support, spousal support, family support, or a criminal restitution.

(c) A financial institution that receives a payment described in subdivision (a) directly from the state shall treat the payment as exempt from levy if it is designated “HOPE trust account payment” or
 if the payment is otherwise sufficiently identified to inform the
 financial institution that the payment is a HOPE trust account payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1010, Sec. 2.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Homestead Exemption [704.710. - 704.850.]

704.710.

As used in this article:

(a) “Dwelling” means a place where a person resides and may include but is not limited to the following:

(1) A house together with the outbuildings and the land upon which they are situated.

(2) A mobilehome together with the outbuildings and the land upon which they are situated.

(3) A boat or other waterborne vessel.

(4) A condominium, as defined in Section 783 of the Civil Code.

(5) A planned development, as defined in Section 11003 of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) A stock cooperative, as defined in Section 11003.2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(7) A community apartment project, as defined in Section 11004 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) “Family unit” means any of the following:

(1) The judgment debtor and the judgment debtor’s spouse if the spouses reside together in the homestead.

(2) The judgment debtor and at least one of the following persons who
 the judgment debtor cares for or maintains in the homestead:

(A) The minor child or minor grandchild of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse or the minor child or grandchild of a deceased spouse or former spouse.

(B) The minor brother or sister of the judgment debtor or judgment debtor’s spouse or the minor child of a deceased brother or sister of either spouse.

(C) The father, mother, grandfather, or grandmother of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse or the father, mother, grandfather, or grandmother of a deceased spouse.

(D) An unmarried relative described in this paragraph who has attained the age of majority and is unable to take care of or support himself or herself.

(3) The judgment debtor’s spouse and at least one of the persons listed in paragraph (2) who the judgment debtor’s spouse cares for or maintains in the homestead.

(c) “Homestead” means the principal dwelling (1) in which the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse resided on the date the judgment creditor’s lien attached to the dwelling, and (2) in which the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse resided continuously thereafter until the date of the court determination that the dwelling is a homestead. Where exempt proceeds from the sale or damage or destruction of a homestead are used toward the acquisition of a dwelling within the six-month period provided by Section 704.720, “homestead” also means the dwelling so acquired if it is the principal dwelling in which the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse resided continuously from the date of acquisition until the date of the court determination that the
 dwelling is a homestead, whether or not an abstract or certified copy of a judgment was recorded to create a judgment lien before the dwelling was acquired.

(d) “Spouse” does not include a married person following entry of a judgment decreeing legal separation of the parties, unless such married persons reside together in the same dwelling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1159, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1984, by Sec. 17 of Ch. 1159.)
-------------------------------------------

704.720.

(a) A homestead is exempt from sale under this division to the extent provided in Section 704.800.

(b) If a homestead is sold under this division or is damaged or destroyed or is acquired for public use, the proceeds of sale or of insurance or other indemnification for damage or destruction of the homestead or the proceeds received as compensation for a homestead acquired for public use are exempt in the amount of the homestead exemption provided in Section 704.730. The
 proceeds are exempt for a period of six months after the time the proceeds are actually received by the judgment debtor, except that, if a homestead exemption is applied to other property of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s spouse during that period, the proceeds thereafter are not exempt.

(c) If the judgment debtor and spouse of the judgment debtor reside in separate homesteads, only the homestead of one of the spouses is exempt and only the proceeds of the exempt homestead are exempt.

(d) If a judgment debtor is not currently residing in the homestead, but his or her separated or former spouse continues to reside in or exercise control over possession of the homestead, that judgment debtor continues to be entitled to an exemption under this article until entry of judgment or other legally enforceable agreement dividing the community property between the judgment
 debtor and the separated or former spouse, or until a later time period as specified by court order. Nothing in this subdivision shall entitle the judgment debtor to more than one exempt homestead. Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 704.710, for purposes of this article, “spouse” may include a separated or former spouse consistent with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

704.730.

(a) The amount of the homestead exemption is the greater of the following:

(1) The countywide median sale price for a single-family home in the calendar year prior to the calendar year in which the judgment debtor claims the exemption, not to exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(2) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000).

(b) The amounts specified in this section shall adjust annually for inflation, beginning on January 1, 2022, based on the change in the annual California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, published by the Department
 of Industrial Relations,
 for the most recent one-year period ending on December 31 preceding the adjustment, with each adjusted amount rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 24.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

704.740.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the interest of a natural person in a dwelling may not be sold under this division to enforce a money judgment except pursuant to a court order for sale obtained under this article and the dwelling exemption shall be determined under this article.

(b) If the dwelling is personal property or is real property in which the judgment debtor has a leasehold estate with an unexpired term of less than two years at the time of levy:

(1) A court order for sale is
 not required and the procedures provided in this article relating to the court order for sale do not apply.

(2) An exemption claim shall be made and determined as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 703.510).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 538, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

704.750.

(a) Promptly after a dwelling is levied upon (other than a dwelling described in subdivision (b) of Section 704.740), the levying officer shall serve notice on the judgment creditor that the levy has been made and that the property will be released unless the judgment creditor complies with the requirements of this section. Service shall be made personally or by mail. Within 20 days after service of the notice, the judgment creditor shall apply to the court for an order for sale of the dwelling and shall
 file a copy of the application with the levying officer. If the judgment creditor does not file the copy of the application for an order for sale of the dwelling within the allowed time, the levying officer shall release the dwelling.

(b) If the dwelling is located in a county other than the county where the judgment was entered:

(1) The judgment creditor shall apply to the superior court of the county where the dwelling is located.

(2) The judgment creditor shall file with the application an abstract of judgment in the form prescribed by Section 674 or, in the case of a judgment described in Section 697.320, a certified copy of the judgment.

(3) The judgment creditor shall pay the filing fee for a motion as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 70617
 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 37.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

704.760.

The judgment creditor’s application shall be made under oath, shall describe the dwelling, and shall contain all of the following:

(a) A statement whether or not the records of the county tax assessor indicate that there is a current homeowner’s exemption or disabled veteran’s exemption for the dwelling and the person or persons who claimed any such exemption.

(b) A statement, which may be based on information and belief, whether the dwelling is a homestead and the amount of the homestead exemption, if any, and a statement whether or not the records of the county recorder indicate that a homestead
 declaration under Article 5 (commencing with Section 704.910) that describes the dwelling has been recorded by the judgment debtor or the spouse of the judgment debtor.

(c) A statement of the amount of any liens or encumbrances on the dwelling, the name of each person having a lien or encumbrance on the dwelling, and the address of such person used by the county recorder for the return of the instrument creating such person’s lien or encumbrance after recording.

(d) A statement that the judgment is based on a consumer debt, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 699.730, or that the judgment is not based on a consumer debt, and if the
 judgment is based on a consumer debt, whether the judgment is based on a consumer debt that was secured by the debtor’s principal place of residence at the time it was incurred or a statement indicating which of the exemptions listed in subdivision (b) of Section 699.730 are applicable. If the statement indicates that paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) is applicable, the statement shall also provide the dollar amount of the original judgment on which the lien is based. If there is more than one basis, the statement shall indicate all bases that are applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 218, Sec. 3.   (AB 2463)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

704.770.

(a) Upon the filing of the application by the judgment creditor, the court shall set a time and place for hearing and order the judgment debtor to show cause why an order for sale should not be made in accordance with the application. The time set for hearing shall be not later than 45 days after the application is filed or such later time as the court orders upon a showing of good cause.

(b) Not later than 30 days before the time set for hearing, the judgment creditor shall do both of the following:

(1) Serve on the judgment debtor a copy of the order to show cause, a copy of the application of the judgment creditor, and a copy of the notice of the hearing in the form prescribed by the Judicial Council. Service shall be made personally or by mail.
